Maine, session 132, LD1316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Documentation of abuse, neglect or exploitation in medical records or other
reports shared with 3rd parties. This section does not require a reporter under this
section acting in the reporter's professional capacity to report suspected abuse, neglect or
exploitation of an incapacitated or dependent adult in the adult's medical record or other
report shared with a person outside of the reporter's office or place of business. If a reporter
under this section documents suspected abuse, neglect or exploitation of an incapacitated
or dependent adult in the adult's medical record or other report that is shared with a person
outside of the reporter's office or place of business and the reporter subsequently receives
additional information that may dispute or counter the documented suspicion, the reporter
shall, subject to the approval of the involved adult or the involved adult's legal guardian,
add the additional information to the medical record or other report and forward the
amended medical record or other report to every person outside the reporter's office or place
or business that received the medical record or report from the reporter.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Subsequent information disputing or countering report. If a reporter receives
information that may dispute or counter a report of suspected abuse, neglect or exploitation
of an incapacitated or dependent adult that the reporter reported to the department, the
reporter shall forward the subsequent information to the department within 48 hours of
discovery of the information, referencing any identifying document or report number of the
initial report, the name and address of the involved adult, the content of the subsequent
information and any supporting documentation regarding the subsequent information, the
source of the subsequent information, the reporter's name and occupation and contact
information for the reporter. This subsection applies regardless of whether the department
accepted the initial report.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Violations. In addition to a penalty under section 3475, a person who violates this
section must be investigated by the department.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3479-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Limitations on immunity. This section does not apply to a person reporting under
this chapter who violates section 3477 or documents an unverified diagnosis or subjective
opinion associated with suspected abuse, neglect or exploitation in the involved adult's
medical record or other report that is shared with a person outside the reporter's office or
place or business, except for a report that was made solely to the department.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §4012, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Documentation of abuse, neglect or exploitation in medical records or other
reports shared with 3rd parties. This section does not require a reporter under this
section acting in the reporter's professional capacity to report suspected abuse, neglect or
exploitation of child in the child's medical record or other report shared with a person
outside of the reporter's office or place of business. If a reporter under this section
documents suspected abuse, neglect or exploitation of a child in the child's medical record
or other report that is shared with a person outside of the reporter's office or place of
Page 1 - 132LR0843(01)

414 business and the reporter subsequently receives additional information that may dispute or
425 counter the documented suspicion, the reporter shall, subject to the approval of the child or
436 child's parent or legal guardian, add the additional information to the medical record or
447 other report and forward the amended medical record or other report to every person outside
458 the reporter's office or place or business that received the medical record or report from the
469 reporter.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §4012, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Subsequent information disputing or countering report. If a reporter receives
information that may dispute or counter a report of suspected abuse, neglect or exploitation
of a child that the reporter reported to the department, the reporter shall forward the
subsequent information to the department within 48 hours of discovery of the information.
The reporter shall reference any identifying document or report number of the initial report,
the name and address of the involved child, the content of the subsequent information and
any supporting documentation regarding the subsequent information, the source of the
subsequent information, the reporter's name and occupation and contact information for the
reporter. This subsection applies regardless of whether the department accepted the initial
report.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §4012, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Violations. In addition to a penalty under section 4009, a person who violates this
section must be investigated by the department.
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §4014, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Limitations on immunity. This section does not apply to a person reporting under
this chapter who violates section 4012 or documents an unverified diagnosis or subjective
opinion associated with suspected abuse, neglect or exploitation in the involved child's
medical record or other report that is shared with a person outside the reporter's office or
place or business, except for a report that was made solely to the department.